Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1906
Trespass; exemption from liability.

The county surveyor in the performance of his official duties, shall not be liable to prosecution for trespass.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 4, p. 143;

R.S.1913, § 5690;

C.S.1922, § 5020;

C.S.1929, § 26-1606;

R.S.1943, § 23-1906.

County surveyor, when in performance of his official duties, is not liable to prosecution for trespass. Kissinger v. State, 123 Neb. 856, 244 N.W. 794 (1932).